Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Custody and Visitation
§ 20-2-202.
Visitation.

The court may order visitation it deems in the best interests of each child and the court shall:

Order visitation in enough detail to promote understanding and compliance;

Provide for the allocation of the costs of transporting each child for purposes of visitation;

Require either parent who plans to change their home city or state of residence, to give written notice thirty (30) days prior to the move, both to the other parent and to the clerk of district court stating the date and destination of the move. In the event a confidentiality order has been entered pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses or other information identifying the residence of the victim of domestic abuse, the address, city or state of residence or other information identifying the residence of the victim of domestic abuse shall remain confidential.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2013 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Many of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Visitation order not sufficiently definite. —

Visitation schedule was deficient because it did not designate which weekends a father would exercise his visitation, or otherwise address that deficiency by requiring the father to provide the mother timely notice of when he proposed to exercise visitation; the district court had to revise its order to specify when the father would exercise weekend visitation because that detail was necessary to promote each party’s understanding of their obligations and to permit it to enforce compliance. Edwards v. Edwards, 2020 WY 35, 459 P.3d 448,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

6 (Wyo. 2020);

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(March 9, 2020).

Allocation of travel costs for visits.—

It was reasonable for the court to require the parents to pay for their own travel expenses under the circumstances of this case, where the record established that the mother voluntarily relocated for better employment, thus creating the need for travel. Walsh v. Smith, 2020 WY 25, 458 P.3d 58,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2020).

Welfare, needs, of children given paramount consideration. —

The definition of “rights of visitation” is an aspect of the determination of custody and, in custody matters, the welfare and needs of the children are to be given paramount consideration. The decision of the trial court with respect to such matters will not be disturbed by the supreme court unless it can identify a clear abuse of discretion. Rowan v. Rowan, 786 P.2d 886,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1990); KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence of child's best interest. —

The court abused its discretion in ruling on visitation and support where there was no evidence regarding the best interest and welfare of the child. KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

Child's need for support and parent's ability to pay not related to visitation questions. —

In an action to modify a divorce decree, the denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Broyles v. Broyles, 711 P.2d 1119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1985).

Visitation schedule modified to serve educational development. —

Where the court's modification of a visitation schedule was designed to serve the best interests of the parties' daughter by ensuring her educational development, the court did not abuse its discretion by modifying the father's visitation rights. Pinther v. Pinther, 888 P.2d 1250,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1995).

Grandparents' visitation rights premised upon statute only. —

Under subsection (c), a grandparent has no standing to petition for visitation rights where his or her request for visitation rights is not premised upon “the death or remarriage of one (1) or both parents or after a divorce or judicial separation.” If grandparents are to have visitation rights in Wyoming, it is only after the occurrence of one of these precipitating events. In re Adoption of RDS, 787 P.2d 968,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1990) (decided prior to 1991 amendment).

And agreement permitting visits void and unenforceable. —

Any agreement, whether it was oral or in writing or whether or not it was included within the terms of an adoption decree, would not give a grandparent a right to visitation with the child. To the extent the existence of any such agreement permitting visitation with the child could be proved, it would be void and unenforceable as violative of public policy. In re Adoption of RDS, 787 P.2d 968,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1990).

Hearing and finding as to visitation rights required. —

The requirement of prior similar provision that “if the court finds, after a hearing, that the visitation would be in the best interest of the child,” was mandatory, and required both a hearing and a written finding of best interest. Nation v. Nation, 715 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1986).

Error to enforce visitation provisions without hearing. —

In a proceeding for the post-decree enforcement of a divorce decree, the court erred in entering an order on the father's motion to enforce provisions of the judgment and decree with respect to visitation without providing him a hearing. Bloom v. Bloom, 798 P.2d 1193,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1990).

Court abused discretion by modifying visitation rights without hearing. —

The district court abused its discretion in modifying the visitation provisions of the divorce decree without affording father an opportunity to be heard or otherwise providing for the development of an evidentiary record. Wolfe v. Wolfe, 899 P.2d 46,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1995).

Error to allow counsel to withdraw but deny request for continuance. —

In a child visitation case, a court erred by allowing the father's counsel to withdraw one day before the trial and by denying his request for a continuance to obtain substitute counsel where the father was not extended notice concerning his counsel's motion to withdraw, there was no withdrawal hearing, and he was not notified of the withdrawal order. Moreover, the hearing concerning visitation was so abbreviated that the trial court could not reasonably have concluded that evidence had been presented of such a change warranting modification of visitation or that modification was in the best interest of the child; therefore, the father was prejudiced by the denial of the continuance. Sims v. Day, 2004 WY 124, 99 P.3d 964,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2004).

Grandparents' visitation claims litigable by independent proceedings or intervention. —

Grandparents' visitation claims may be litigated by independent proceedings; or, pursuant to the provisions of Rule 24(b), W.R.C.P., by intervening in a divorce proceeding post-decree, in the exercise of discretion of the court, when the requisite facts under the rule exist. Nation v. Nation, 715 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1986).

Court may clarify modification order. —

Where the language employed by the court in modifying the visitation provisions of a divorce decree was subject to misconstruction, the court could properly clarify its earlier modification order in light of the circumstances of the parents and for the benefit of the children. Bachand v. Walters, 809 P.2d 284,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1991).

Visitation in correctional facility. —

While there is no absolute right to visitation in a correctional facility, denial of visitation, or modification of visitation, must be based upon evidence conspicuous in the record. Wolfe v. Wolfe, 899 P.2d 46,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1995).

Allocation of travel costs for visits. —

In a divorce action, a district court did not err in requiring a custodial parent to pay the travel expenses associated with two visits per year to the non-custodial parent's location because the travel costs were substantial and the custodial parent helped to create the situation by moving the parties' children to another state. Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

District court did not abuse its discretion in requiring a father to pay his children's mother a per diem when she visited the children at their new out-of-state home because there was no immutable standard for the allocation of travel expenses for the purpose of visitation and the determination of the reasonableness of such an award was to be made on a case-by-case basis.
Inman v. Williams, 2009 WY 51, 205 P.3d 185,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2009).

Liberal visitation supported by evidence. —

Trial court properly ordered the parties to have alternate weeks with their minor child once he reached five years of age because the trial court properly provided a comprehensive evaluation of all the relevant factors before ordering such liberal visitation as amounted to equally splitting the child's time, the opportunities to disagree were reduced because the father had been given primary decision-making authority regarding the child's health and well-being, and the child had a half-brother on the mother's side.
JS v. MB, 2010 WY 114, 237 P.3d 974,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2010).

Visitation order not sufficiently definite. —

Trial court's visitation order was not sufficiently definite to promote understanding and compliance as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-202(a)(i) because the order did not address holiday and summer visitation.
Roemmich v. Roemmich, 2010 WY 115, 238 P.3d 89,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2010).

Provision regarding visitation contained in the stipulated decree did not meet the requirements of this statute because the provision simply stated that the father should have reasonable visitation rights with the minor children at the mother’s discretion, which was insufficient for the parents to each understand their obligations, and so the decree could be enforced by contempt sanctions should that regrettably become necessary; a proper visitation provision should specify which weekends, holidays, and other days the father was allowed visitation; details concerning overnight visits and issues relating to transportation between the parents; and specify how the visitation schedule would change as the children got older. Long v. Long, 2018 WY 26, 413 P.3d 117,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2018).

District court's
visitation plan was not sufficiently definite to promote understanding
and compliance as required the statute, and remand was required. IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135, 360 P.3d 999,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2015).

Quoted

in

GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interference by custodian of child with noncustodial parent's visitation rights as ground for change of custody, 28 ALR4th 9.

Visitation rights of homosexual or lesbian parent, 36 ALR4th 997.

Parent's or relative's rights of visitation of adult against latter's wishes, 40 ALR4th 846.

Religion as factor in visitation cases, 95 ALR5th 533.

Restrictions on parent's child visitation rights based on parent's sexual conduct, 99 ALR5th 475.

§ 20-2-203.
Jurisdiction for enforcement and modification.

A court in this state which enters a custody order under W.S.

20-2-201

has continuing subject matter jurisdiction to enforce or modify the decree concerning the care, custody and visitation of the children as the circumstances of the parents and needs of the child require, subject to the provisions of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. A service member’s temporary duty, deployment or mobilization, as defined in W.S.

20-2-205

, shall not alter any court’s continuing jurisdiction under this section. A court which has jurisdiction to enforce or modify an order under this section may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it finds it is an inconvenient forum under the circumstances of the case and that the court which entered the original order is a more appropriate forum and has jurisdiction as set forth in the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

A court in any county in Wyoming in which the child has lived with his parents, a parent or a person acting as a parent for six (6) consecutive months immediately prior to commencement of the custody proceeding may assert subject matter jurisdiction and adjudicate any proceedings involving the child. Periods of temporary absence of any of the named persons shall be included as part of the six (6) month period.

Any party seeking to enforce or modify a custody order pursuant to this section shall attach a certified copy of the custody order to the petition to be enforced or modified. A certified copy of an order entered by a Wyoming court providing for the care, custody or visitation of children may be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of any county in this state in which either parent resides if neither parent resides in the county of original jurisdiction. The district court for the county in which the order is filed has jurisdiction to enforce the order, provided:

Upon request of the district court for the county in which a certified copy of the order has been filed, the court which originally entered the order shall forward certified copies of the transcript of the court record and pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings, social studies and other pertinent documents relating to the original proceeding; and

The district court for the county in which a certified copy of the order has been filed shall give due consideration to the transcript of the record and all other documents submitted to it in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection.

In any proceeding to enforce or modify an order concerning the care, custody and visitation of children, any required notice or pleading shall be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2005, ch. 11, § 2; 2011, ch. 36, § 2.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, see
§§

20-5-201

to

20-5-502

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), twice inserted “and Enforcement” preceding “Act.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted the present second sentence in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Many of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Continuing jurisdiction of divorce court. —

Father's failure to attach a copy of the referenced order did not deprive the district court of subject matter jurisdiction over his petition to modify child custody and support because the father identified the decree he was seeking to modify by title and date in his petition, which was filed in the same court and under the same docket number as the original decree; the mother was aware of the original decree and the grounds for the father's petition for modification. Brush v. Davis, 2013 WY 161, 315 P.3d 648,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2013).

District court had continuing jurisdiction to enforce and modify custody provisions of a decree because a father's modification petition was filed in the same district court that granted the original divorce decree in which the mother was awarded primary physical custody of the child Brush v. Davis, 2013 WY 161, 315 P.3d 648,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2013).

In proceedings for modification of a divorce decree, an opportunity to be heard is required.

Tanner v. Tanner, 482 P.2d 443,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1971).

Proceeding to modify divorce decree is filed under same docket assigned in original proceeding.

Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in original court. —

A district court lacked jurisdiction to modify child custody, support and visitation provisions of a divorce decree entered by the district court of another county; continuing jurisdiction in the court which issued the decree was exclusive. Nicholaus v. Nicholaus, 756 P.2d 1338,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1988).

District court did not err when it ordered the potential re-opening of a mother's petition to modify custody in the event that the children's father continued to flaunt the district court's visitation orders after the father relocated because the district court had continuing jurisdiction in custody and visitation matters. Although the father viewed the order as a threat that exceeded the district court's jurisdiction, the reviewing court viewed it as a warning that the father's continued recalcitrance could undermine the district court's initial determination that the father's intent to relocate was properly motivated and sincere.
Inman v. Williams, 2009 WY 51, 205 P.3d 185,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2009).

Jurisdiction to modify decree issued by district court in another county. —

If a party wishes to file a petition for modification of custody or maintenance in a district court other than that which issued the original decree, the party must file a certified copy of the decree and show that both parties no longer reside in the county of original jurisdiction, and in addition one parent must reside in the county in which the decree is filed. Vineyard v. Jenkins, 983 P.2d 1234,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1999).

Jurisdiction not transferable to other district court. —

The district court in Natrona County, in which an original divorce decree was entered, had no authority to transfer jurisdiction to the district court in Platte County without notice of the parties, and that court had no authority to accept such a transfer of jurisdiction. However, the Natrona County district court could have transferred the case to Platte County to hear the case and exercise jurisdiction of the Natrona County district court, provided that any order entered pursuant to such an arrangement was filed in Natrona County. Glandt v. Taylor, 920 P.2d 647,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1996).

Continuing jurisdiction of divorce court. —

The trial court has, as part of its continuing jurisdiction to modify a divorce decree, authority to declare valid a presumed parent-child relationship arising out of the marriage and to make orders of custody and support for the child conceived during the marriage, even after the divorce is final. CSP v. DDC, 842 P.2d 528,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1992).

Oral motion for modification improper way to assert claim. —

The oral motion of the plaintiff for modification of a divorce decree, made on the date of hearing of the formal and properly filed petition for modification of the decree of divorce by the defendant, was an improper way to assert his claim. The proper procedure was for the plaintiff to file an answer and counterclaim for modification to the petition for modification, in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, and thereafter the case would have been handled in the same fashion as any other civil case. Since the time for answer and counterclaim had passed, it was suggested that the plaintiff file a petition for modification and that, on the rehearing of the case which the appellate court required, it be consolidated with the defendant's petition for modification for trial. Macy v. Macy, 714 P.2d 774,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1986).

Provision for retention of jurisdiction to make custody determination. —

Retention of jurisdiction provision, providing “the state of Wyoming shall retain jurisdiction over the custody of the minor child,” would not provide a Wyoming court with jurisdiction to make a custody determination unless the child or one of his parents continued to reside in the state and/or maintain the necessary significant connections to sustain subject matter and in personam jurisdiction. Crites v. Alston, 837 P.2d 1061,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1992).

Provision in divorce decree stating “the district courts of the state of Wyoming shall retain jurisdiction over the custody of the minor child” did not impose upon the father an affirmative obligation or duty to attempt custody modification only in a Wyoming court, nor did the provision impose an affirmative obligation or duty not to attempt to modify child custody in a state other than Wyoming; therefore the father could not be held in contempt for violating the order when he sought to have the custody decree modified in a Texas court. Crites v. Alston, 837 P.2d 1061,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1992).

Limitations on jurisdiction. —

Even though the state had continuing jurisdiction to modify a custody decree which granted the father visitation, it did not have jurisdiction to issue an order that another state, to which the custodial parent had moved, notify the court of the custodial parent's address. Lacey v. Lacey, 925 P.2d 237,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1996).

In post-divorce proceedings, the district court erred by modifying child custody the absence of a petition from either party/parent seeking such modification. It was without jurisdiction to do so under this section.
Weiss v. Weiss, 2009 WY 124, 217 P.3d 408,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. Nov. 10, 2009).

Continuing jurisdiction as to children does not extend to rights of parents between themselves. —

To say that the court has a continuing jurisdiction and a responsibility to revise its provisions for the custody of children, according to their best interest and welfare, is not to say the court retains the same kind of continuing jurisdiction with respect to the civil rights of the parents, as between each other. Strahan v. Strahan, 400 P.2d 542,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1965); Pavlica v. Pavlica, 587 P.2d 639,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1978).

Inconvenient forum. —

Wyoming district court did not abuse its discretion when it declined to exercise jurisdiction to resolve child custody and visitation issues arising from the parties’ original Wyoming divorce decree because the court weighed the statutory factors and found that it was an inconvenient forum under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-5-201

et seq., as the parties lived in different, foreign countries. Pokrovskaya v. Van Genderen, 2021 WY 68, 487 P.3d 228,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2021).

Quoted

in

GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Willis v. Davis, 2010 WY 149, 243 P.3d 568,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Nov. 18, 2010); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Mar. 19, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction of court to award custody of child domiciled in state but physically outside of it, 9 ALR2d 434.

Necessity of personal service within state upon nonresident spouse as prerequisite of court's power to modify its decree as to child support in matrimonial action, 62 ALR2d 544.

Opening or modification of divorce decree as to custody or support of child not provided for in the decree, 71 ALR2d 1370.

Court's power to modify child custody order as affected by agreement which was incorporated in divorce decree, 73 ALR2d 1444.